Washington statutes.
RCW 37.04.010

Consent given to acquisition of land by United States.

The consent of this state is hereby given to the acquisition by the United States, or under its authority, by purchase, lease, condemnation, or otherwise, of any land acquired, or to be acquired, in this state by the United States, from any individual, body politic or corporate, as sites for forts, magazines, arsenals, dockyards, and other needful buildings or for any other purpose whatsoever. The evidence of title to such land shall be recorded as in other cases.

[ 1939 c 126 s 1; RRS s 8108-1.]